District of Columbia statutes.
23-1102

Bonding business impressed with public interests.

The bonding business is impressed with a public interest.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 635, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-1102.
1973 Ed., § 23-1102.